Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-109
Register of deeds; county clerk; fees.

(1) The register of deeds and the county clerk shall receive for recording a deed, mortgage, or release, recording and indexing of a will, recording and indexing of a decree in a testate estate, recording proof of publication, or recording any other instrument, a fee of ten dollars for the first page and six dollars for each additional page. Two dollars and fifty cents of the ten-dollar fee for recording the first page and fifty cents of the six-dollar fee for recording each additional page shall be used exclusively for the purposes of preserving and maintaining public records of the office of the register of deeds and for modernization and technology needs relating to such records and preserving and maintaining public records of a register of deeds office that has been consolidated with another county office pursuant to section 22-417 and for modernization and technology needs relating to such records. The funds allocated under this subsection shall not be substituted for other allocations of county general funds to the register of deeds office or any other county office for the purposes enumerated in this subsection.

(2) The cost for a certified copy of any instrument filed or recorded in the office of county clerk or register of deeds shall be one dollar and fifty cents per page.

Laws 1879, § 1, p. 107;

Laws 1887, c. 42, § 1, p. 461;

R.S.1913, § 2435;

C.S.1922, § 2375;

C.S.1929, § 33-114;

Laws 1931, c. 66, § 1, p. 185;

Laws 1935, c. 80, § 1, p. 269;

Laws 1941, c. 67, § 1, p. 292;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 33-114;

R.S.1943, § 33-109;

Laws 1949, c. 93, § 5, p. 247;

Laws 1961, c. 159, § 1, p. 484;

Laws 1963, c. 185, § 1, p. 626;

Laws 1965, c. 185, § 1, p. 574;

Laws 1967, c. 204, § 1, p. 560;

Laws 1969, c. 270, § 1, p. 1034;

Laws 1971, LB 381, § 1;

Laws 1972, LB 1264, § 1;

Laws 1983, LB 463, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB14, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB152, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB268, § 7;

Laws 2019, LB593, § 5.

The county clerk of a county under township organization is not entitled to any compensation for making a duplicate tax list. Radford v. Dixon County, 29 Neb. 113, 45 N.W. 275 (1890).